Illinois, session 104th, HB4553.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.3 new)7    Sec. 1.3. Criminal history records check for official 8licensure. 9    (a) An association or other entity that has as one of its 10purposes promoting, sponsoring, regulating, or in any manner 11providing for interscholastic athletics or any form of 12athletic competition among schools and students within this 13State shall require applicants for licensure as an official to 14authorize a fingerprint-based criminal history records check 15to determine if such applicants have been convicted of any 16disqualifying, enumerated criminal or drug offenses as set 17forth in Section 21B-80 of the School Code or have been 18convicted, within 7 years of the application for licensure, of 19any other felony under the laws of this State or of any offense 20committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws 21of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this 22State, would have been punishable as a felony under the laws of 23this State.  HB4553- 2 -LRB104 18102 LNS 31541 b1    (b) Authorization for the check shall be furnished by the 2applicant to the association or entity, unless the applicant 3has previously authorized a check in a prior year's 4application through a school district, regional office of 5education, or such an association or entity. The association 6or entity may require the applicant to furnish authorization 7for the check to the regional superintendent of schools of the 8educational service region in which the applicant resides.9    (c) After receipt of the authorization under subsection 10(b), the applicant shall submit his or her fingerprints to the 11Illinois State Police in an electronic format that complies 12with the form and manner for requesting and furnishing 13criminal history record information prescribed by the Illinois 14State Police. Such fingerprints shall be transmitted through a 15livescan fingerprint vendor licensed by the Department of 16Financial and Professional Regulation.17    The fingerprints submitted under this Section shall be 18checked against the Illinois State Police criminal history 19record databases prior to their submission to the Federal 20Bureau of Investigation criminal history record databases, now 21and hereafter filed, including, but not limited to, civil, 22criminal, and latent fingerprint databases.23    The Illinois State Police shall charge the applicant a fee 24for conducting the criminal history records check, which shall 25be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and may not 26exceed the actual cost of the records check.  HB4553- 3 -LRB104 18102 LNS 31541 b1    The Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to 2positive identification, records of Illinois convictions and 3shall forward the national criminal history record information 4to the executive director of the association or entity that 5requested the check. Any information obtained by the executive 6director may only be disseminated as authorized by law.7    (d) The association's or entity's executive director or 8the executive director's designee shall perform a check of the 9Statewide Sex Offender Database, as authorized by the Sex 10Offender Community Notification Law, for each applicant. The 11check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database must be conducted 12by the executive director or the executive director's designee 13once every 5 years that an applicant remains licensed by the 14association or entity.15    (e) The association's or entity's executive director or 16the executive director's designee shall perform a check of the 17Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 18Database, as authorized by the Murderer and Violent Offender 19Against Youth Community Notification Law, for each applicant. 20The check of the Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender 21Against Youth Database must be conducted by the executive 22director or the executive director's designee once every 5 23years that an applicant remains licensed by the association or 24entity.25    (f) Pending full clearance of all check requirements under 26this Section, the prospective official must be supervised at   HB4553- 4 -LRB104 18102 LNS 31541 b1all times by an individual who received a qualifying result on 2all check components under this Section. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42027.